Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.906

Effective date—2003 c 92.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 23, 2003].

[ 2003 c 92 s 12.]